Maryland, session 2026, SB0294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–301.
(a) On motion of the State or on request of a victim or witness, during a criminal
trial or a juvenile delinquency adjudicatory hearing, a court may prohibit the release of the
address or telephone number of the victim or witness unless the court determines that good
cause is shown for the release of the information.
(b) (1) (i) In this subsection SECTION the following words have the
meanings indicated.
(ii) (2) “Identifying information” means the name of, and any
other information that could reasonably be expected to identify, a minor victim, A VICTIM
OF SEXUAL ASSAULT, OR A VICTIM OF STALKING.
(iii) (3) “Minor victim” means [a] AN ALLEGED victim of a crime
or delinquent act who was a minor at the time that the crime or delinquent act occurred.
– 1 –

Ch. 542 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(IV) (4) “VICTIM OF SEXUAL ASSAULT” MEANS AN ALLEGED
VICTIM OF SEXUALLY ASSAULTIVE BEHAVIOR AS DEFINED IN § 10–923 OF THE
COURTS ARTICLE OR A CRIME UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 11 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE.
(V) (5) “VICTIM OF STALKING” MEANS AN ALLEGED VICTIM
OF STALKING AS DEFINED IN § 3–802 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(B) ON MOTION OF THE STATE OR ON REQUEST OF A VICTIM OR WITNESS,
DURING A CRIMINAL TRIAL OR A JUVENILE DELINQUENCY ADJUDICATORY
HEARING, A COURT MAY PROHIBIT THE RELEASE OF THE ADDRESS OR TELEPHONE
NUMBER OF THE VICTIM OR WITNESS UNLESS THE COURT DETERMINES THAT GOOD
CAUSE IS SHOWN FOR THE RELEASE OF THE INFORMATION.
(2) (C) Notwithstanding any other law, on notice that an electronic or
paper filing includes identifying information of a minor victim, unless the court finds by
clear and convincing evidence that there is good cause to order otherwise, the court or a
party in a criminal or juvenile delinquency case may not disclose or allow inspection of an
electronic or paper court filing, including a charging document, to a nonparty to the
criminal or juvenile delinquency case unless the court or the party disclosing or allowing
inspection of the filing redacts all identifying information that appears in the filing.
(3) (D) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, ON NOTICE
THAT A CASE FILING OR RECORD INCLUDES IDENTIFYING INFORMATION OF A
VICTIM OF SEXUAL ASSAULT OR A VICTIM OF STALKING, UNLESS THE COURT FINDS
CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT THERE IS GOOD CAUSE TO ORDER
OTHERWISE, THE COURT OR A PARTY IN A CRIMINAL OR JUVENILE DELINQUENCY
CASE MAY NOT DISCLOSE OR ALLOW INSPECTION OF AN ELECTRONIC OR PAPER
COURT FILING OR RECORD, INCLUDING A CHARGING DOCUMENT, TO A NONPARTY
TO THE CRIMINAL OR JUVENILE DELINQUENCY CASE, EXCEPT TO THE VICTIM OR
THE VICTIM’S REPRESENTATIVE, UNLESS THE COURT OR THE PARTY DISCLOSING OR
ALLOWING INSPECTION OF THE FILING OR RECORD REDACTS ALL IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION THAT APPEARS IN THE FILING OR RECORD.
(4) (2) ON WRITTEN REQUEST OF A VICTIM OF SEXUAL ASSAULT OR
A VICTIM OF STALKING, THE COURT SHALL REDACT IDENTIFYING INFORMATION
RELATING TO THE VICTIM FROM AN EXISTING FILING OR RECORD.
(3) (I) 1. A HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD THAT HAS LICENSED
OR CERTIFIED THE DEFENDANT OR RESPONDENT MAY PETITION THE COURT TO
ORDER THE DISCLOSURE OR ALLOW INSPECTION OF AN UNREDACTED FILING OR
RECORD DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR THE PURPOSE OF
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 542
INVESTIGATING OR OTHERWISE DISCIPLINING THE DEFENDANT OR RESPONDENT
FOR SEXUAL MISCONDUCT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 1–212 OF THE HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE.
2. THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD SHALL SERVE
NOTICE OF THE PETITION ON EACH PARTY IN THE CASE.
(II) AFTER RECEIVING NOTICE OF A PETITION UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE STATE’S ATTORNEY SHALL NOTIFY
EACH VICTIM IN THE CASE:
1. THAT A PETITION HAS BEEN FILED TO RELEASE THE
VICTIM’S IDENTIFYING INFORMATION TO A HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD FOR THE
PURPOSE OF DISCIPLINE AGAINST THE DEFENDANT OR RESPONDENT;
2. OF THE TYPE OF INFORMATION THAT MAY BE
RELEASED TO THE BOARD;
3. HOW THE VICTIM MAY OBJECT TO THE DISCLOSURE
TO OR INSPECTION OF THE UNREDACTED FILING OR RECORD; AND
4. OF THE SEXUAL ASSAULT CRISIS PROGRAMS
CERTIFIED UNDER § 11–923 OF THIS TITLE.
(III) UNLESS A VICTIM IN THE CASE OBJECTS, AN
INVESTIGATION OR OTHER DISCIPLINARY ACTION TAKEN BY A HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS BOARD AGAINST A DEFENDANT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 1–212 OF
THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE IS GOOD CAUSE TO ALLOW DISCLOSURE OR
INSPECTION OF AN UNREDACTED FILING OR RECORD.
(IV) A HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD THAT OBTAINS A FILING
OR RECORD UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT PUBLICLY DISCLOSE THE RECORD
OR FILING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 3 –